South Dakota, session 2026, HB1320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 7-8-29 be AMENDED:
7-8-29. Such appeal shall be taken within twenty days after the publication of the
decision of the board by serving written notice upon any county auditor or commissioner,
upon the state's attorney of that county, or upon any person appointed by the board
pursuant to resolution to accept notice, when the appeal is taken by any person aggrieved
by the decision of the board, and upon the person or persons affected by the decision of
the board when the appeal is taken by the state's attorney.
Upon the filing of the required bond and the payment of fees, which are equal to
those imposed by a register of deeds for like services, the county auditor shall make out
a complete transcript of the proceedings of the board relating to the matter of the board's
decision and deliver the transcript to the clerk of courts.

26.909.12 2 1320
An Act to revise a provision related to service of process for boards of county commissioners.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1320
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1320 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1320 ENROLLED